Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 5

City Court

6-21-501. City judges — Jurisdiction — Qualifications and compensation — Elections — Temporary replacement.

There shall be a city court presided over by a city judge. The board of commissioners may appoint a city judge who shall serve at the will of the board. The city judge shall have such qualifications and receive such compensation as the board may provide by ordinance.

At the regular general election in August 1990, the candidate for city judge who receives the highest number of votes shall be elected to the position of city judge for a term of eight (8) years and shall be a licensed attorney authorized to practice in the courts of this state. The city judge shall be not less than thirty (30) years of age and shall be a resident of the county within which the city lies. The city judge shall receive such compensation as the board by ordinance may establish; provided, that such compensation shall not be altered for the term for which the city judge is elected.

All fees shall be paid into the treasury of the city and are not to be considered as part of the compensation of the city judge. In the absence or disability of the city judge, a general sessions court judge of the county within which the city lies shall sit temporarily as city judge. Any vacancy in the office of city judge shall be filled by the board until the next regularly scheduled election is conducted.

This subsection (b) is local in effect and shall become effective in a particular municipality upon the contingency of a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of the municipality approving this subsection (b). Unless the municipality's charter provides otherwise, by the same vote, the legislative body of the municipality may revoke the approval of this subsection (b), and this subsection (b) shall become ineffective upon the end of the term of the city judge elected under this subsection (b).

This subsection (b) only applies in counties having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

This subsection (b) does not apply in any county having a population greater than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census.

This subsection (b) shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than four hundred seventy thousand (470,000) nor more than four hundred eighty thousand (480,000), according to the 1980 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census.

If a city judge is unable to preside over city court for any reason, then, to the extent a general sessions court judge agrees to serve temporarily as city judge, the judge shall appoint a general sessions judge of the county within which the city lies to sit in the city judge's stead. If there is not a general sessions judge available, then the city judge shall appoint an attorney, meeting the same qualifications as a general sessions judge, to sit temporarily.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a164; Code 1932, § 3561; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 1; 1979, ch. 309, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2119; Acts 1981, ch. 176, § 1; 1982, ch. 888, § 1; 1982, ch. 889, § 1; 1989, ch. 191, § 1; 1989, ch. 520, §§ 1, 2, 4-6; 1990, ch. 622, § 1; 1996, ch. 633, § 1; 2004, ch. 914, § 6b; 2011, ch. 453, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Judges, municipal, minimum salary in municipalities of over 170,000 population, § 6-56-109.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal judge serving as assistant public defender for county, OAG 98-0123, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 123 (7/17/98).

City courts have jurisdiction to enforce a child curfew law against a parent, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

Cited: Elizabethton v. Carter County, 204 Tenn. 452, 321 S.W.2d 822, 1958 Tenn. LEXIS 276 (1958).

6-21-502. Power to enforce ordinances.

The city judge has the power and authority to:

Impose fines, costs, and forfeitures, and punish by fine for violations of city ordinances;

Preserve and enforce order in such city judge's court;

Enforce the collection of all such fines, costs, and forfeitures imposed by such city judge; and

In default of payment, or of good and sufficient security given for the payment of such fines, costs or forfeitures imposed by such city judge, if:

The city court has concurrent jurisdiction with the general sessions court, the city judge is authorized to enter an order in accordance with § 40-24-104 which, in accordance with such section, may include imprisonment until the fine, costs or forfeitures, or any portion of it, is paid. No such imprisonment shall exceed the period of time established in § 40-24-104, for any one (1) offense or violation.

The city court does not have concurrent jurisdiction with the general sessions court, the city judge is authorized to enter an order for contempt of court for the payment of the fine in the amount established pursuant to § 16-18-306.

Fines may be paid in installments in the manner provided by ordinance or in accordance with § 40-24-104. Any court is authorized to enforce the collection of unpaid fines or forfeitures as a judgment in a civil action in any court with competent jurisdiction in accordance with § 40-24-105. The city judge may remit, with or without condition, fines and costs imposed for violation of any ordinance provision.

The city judge may remit, with or without condition, fines and costs imposed for violation of any ordinance or charter provision.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a165; Code 1932, § 3562; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2120; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 15; 1995, ch. 13, § 12; 2011, ch. 453, § 8.

Attorney General Opinions. A city judge does not have jurisdiction to dispose of criminal charges in exchange for voluntary contributions to the city court special fund from criminal defendants in lieu of the assessment of fines, penalties, or other disposition of proceedings, OAG 00-114, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 116 (6/20/00).

City courts are limited to monetary penalties against a parent in enforcing curfew violations, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

6-21-503. Docket.

The city judge shall keep, or cause to be kept, a court docket or dockets embodying complete detailed records of all cases handled by the city judge.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 1997a170; Code 1932, § 3567; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2121.

6-21-504. Arrest warrant.

Only one (1) warrant shall be issued for the same offense, the warrant to embrace all of the parties charged with the same offense.

No arrest shall be made, except upon a warrant duly issued, unless the offense is committed in the presence of the officer making the arrest, or unless in a case of felony.

The affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall especially state the offense charged.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a167; Code 1932, § 3564; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2122.

Cross-References. Persons whose compensation is contingent upon issuance or nonissuance are prohibited from issuing a search warrant, an arrest warrant, or mittimus, § 40-5-106.

6-21-505. Appearance bond.

Whenever any person is arrested for the violation of any city ordinance in the presence of a police officer, and no warrant has been issued or served, such person may execute an appearance bond in an amount not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), and file same with a police desk sergeant, or may, in lieu of the execution of an appearance bond, deposit a sum not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), with a police desk sergeant and be given a receipt for same, and, on the appearance of such person before the city court at the time specified in the receipt, such deposit shall be returned to that person. On the failure of such person to appear at the time specified, the amount so deposited shall be forfeited to the municipality and such person shall not be entitled to the return of any part thereof and it shall not be necessary to issue a scire facias; provided, that within two (2) days of the imposition of the forfeiture, the city judge shall have the power to set aside the conditional judgment imposing such forfeiture when it shall be made to appear that the failure of the accused to appear and defend such accused's suit was due to no fault or negligence of the accused. After the expiration of the two (2) days, there may be a final judgment imposing a forfeiture.

Acts 1953, ch. 196, § 1; 1965, ch. 330, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2123.

6-21-506. Disposition of fines and labor.

All fines imposed by the city judge for violations of city ordinances shall belong to and be paid into the treasury of the city.

Any labor performed in the execution of a workhouse or prison sentence for such violation or violations shall be performed for the city under the direction of the city manager.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a168; Code 1932, § 3565; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2124.

6-21-507. Collection of fines and cost.

The city judge, in all cases heard or determined by such city judge for offenses against the corporate laws and ordinances, shall set and collect municipal court costs in accordance with § 16-18-304, shall levy and collect the litigation tax in accordance with § 16-18-305 and, in addition, shall add thereto one dollar ($1.00), as a tax on all such cases. The city judge shall certify to the chief of police for collection, all fines, costs, and forfeitures imposed by the city judge for offenses against the laws and ordinances of the city. Costs in favor of any person paid a fixed salary by the city shall belong to the city and be paid into its treasury. It is the duty of the city judge to collect and receipt for all fines imposed by the city judge, and the city judge shall render a monthly report to the board of commissioners of all costs and fines collected and of all assessed and uncollected.

It is unlawful for any other person or officer to collect or receipt for such fines, costs, and recoveries, but the city judge may authorize the chief of police to collect and receipt for fines and costs.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1997a169; Code 1932, § 3566; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2125; Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 6b.

6-21-508. Appeal from city judge's judgment.

Any person dissatisfied with the judgment of the city judge in any case or cases heard and determined by the city judge, may, within ten (10) entire days thereafter, Sundays exclusive, appeal to the next circuit court of the county, upon giving bond with good and sufficient security as approved by the city judge for such person's appearance or the faithful prosecution of the appeal; provided, that in prosecutions for violations of the city ordinances, the bond shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 9, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a166; Code 1932, § 3563; Acts 1965, ch. 330, § 2; 1969, ch. 287, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2126.

Cross-References. Appellate jurisdiction of circuit court, § 16-10-112.